Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Article 4. Return from Deployment.

403A.401.
Procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by agreement.

At any time after return from deployment, a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

may be terminated by an agreement to terminate signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

A temporary agreement under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

granting custodial responsibility terminates:

If an agreement to terminate under subsection (1) of this section specifies a date for termination, on that date; or

If the agreement to terminate does not specify a date, on the date the agreement to terminate is signed by the deploying parent and the other parent.

In the absence of an agreement under subsection (1) of this section to terminate, a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility terminates under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

sixty (60) days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent that the deploying parent returned from deployment.

If a temporary agreement granting custodial responsibility was filed with a court pursuant to KRS

403A.205

, an agreement to terminate the temporary agreement also shall be filed with that court within a reasonable time after the signing of the agreement. The case number and heading of the case concerning custodial responsibility or child support shall be provided to the court with the agreement to terminate.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 24, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.402.
Consent procedure for terminating temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

At any time after a deploying parent returns from deployment, the deploying parent and the other parent may file with the court an agreement to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility issued under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

. After an agreement has been filed, the court shall issue an order terminating the temporary order effective on the date specified in the agreement. If a date is not specified, the order is effective immediately.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 25, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.403.
Visitation before termination of temporary grant of custodial responsibility.

After a deploying parent returns from deployment until a temporary agreement or order for custodial responsibility established under KRS

403A.201

to

403A.205

or KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

is terminated, the court shall issue a temporary order granting the deploying parent reasonable contact with the child unless it is contrary to the best interest of the child, even if the time of contact exceeds the time the deploying parent spent with the child before the deployment.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 26, effective June 29, 2021.

403A.404.
Termination by operation of law of temporary grant of custodial responsibility established by court order.

If an agreement between the parties to terminate a temporary order for custodial responsibility under KRS

403A.301

to

403A.311

has not been filed, the order terminates sixty (60) days after the deploying parent gives notice to the other parent and any nonparent granted custodial responsibility that the deploying parent has returned from deployment.

A proceeding seeking to prevent termination of a temporary order for custodial responsibility is governed by law of this state other than this chapter.

HISTORY:

2021 ch. 94, § 27, effective June 29, 2021.